Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.225.105 and 2020 c 302 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:A person licensed under this chapter shall not disclose the written acknowledgment of the disclosure statement pursuant to RCW 18.225.100, nor any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in a professional capacity when the information was necessary to enable the individual to render professional services to those persons except:(1) With the written authorization of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative;(2) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against the person licensed under this chapter;(3) In response to a subpoena from the secretary. The secretary may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under RCW 18.130.050;(4) As required under chapter 26.44 or 74.34 RCW or RCW 71.05.217 (6) and (7); ((or))(5) When disclosure of health care information is permitted under chapter 70.02 RCW; or(6) To any individual if the person licensed under this chapter reasonably believes that disclosure will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the individual or any other individual; however, there is no obligation on the part of the provider to so disclose.Sec. 2. RCW 18.19.180 and 2023 c 425 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:An individual credentialed under this chapter shall not disclose the written acknowledgment of the disclosure statement pursuant to RCW 18.19.060 nor any information acquired from persons consulting the individual in a professional capacity when that information was necessary to enable the individual to render professional services to those persons except:(1) With the written consent of that person or, in the case of death or disability, the person's personal representative, other person authorized to sue, or the beneficiary of an insurance policy on the person's life, health, or physical condition;(2) That a person credentialed under this chapter is not required to treat as confidential a communication that reveals the contemplation or commission of a crime or harmful act;(3) If the person is a minor, and the information acquired by the person credentialed under this chapter indicates that the minor was the victim or subject of a crime, the person credentialed may testify fully upon any examination, trial, or other proceeding in which the commission of the crime is the subject of the inquiry;(4) If the person waives the privilege by bringing charges against the person credentialed under this chapter;(5) In response to a subpoena from a court of law or the secretary. The secretary may subpoena only records related to a complaint or report under chapter 18.130 RCW; ((or))(6) As required under chapter 26.44 RCW; or(7) When disclosure of health care information is permitted under chapter 70.02 RCW.--- END ---